Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 6.1 Cooperative Housing Corporations

7-6.1-1.
Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to foster safe, decent, and affordable housing in the state by enabling individuals to form cooperative housing corporations for the purpose of developing, acquiring, owning, and operating multifamily housing on a cooperative plan.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 256, § 1.

7-6.1-2.
Applicability of chapter — Amendment of articles of incorporation to comply with chapter.

This chapter applies to all cooperative housing corporations organized under it. Any corporation organized under any other chapter of the general laws may become a cooperative housing corporation by adopting an amendment to its articles electing to become subject to this chapter and by adopting any further amendment necessary to comply with this chapter. The amendment must be adopted and filed and is effective according to the chapter under which the corporation was organized before acceptance of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 256, § 1.

7-6.1-3.
Cooperative housing corporations subject to certain laws.

All cooperative housing corporations are subject to laws that are enacted affecting or altering their corporate rights or duties or dissolving them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 256, § 1.

7-6.1-4.
Definitions.

In this chapter, the following words have the following meanings:

“Board” means board of directors;

“Bylaws” means the bylaws of a cooperative housing corporation as they exist from time to time;

“Cooperative housing corporation” means a corporation organized or existing under this chapter;

“Limited-equity cooperative housing corporation” means a cooperative housing corporation organized and operated primarily for the benefit of low- and moderate-income persons and whose equity, after allowance for maximum transfer value of its stock, is permanently dedicated to providing housing to persons of low or moderate income or to a charitable purpose;

“Member” means a person who holds voting rights in a non-business cooperative housing corporation by virtue of a membership certificate issued by that corporation;

“Non-business cooperative housing corporation” means a limited-equity housing cooperative that, pursuant to §

7-6.1-5

, elects to apply chapter 6 of this title to the corporation’s operations. All other cooperative housing corporations are business cooperative housing corporations;

“Proprietary lease” means an agreement between a cooperative housing corporation and its stockholders or members for occupancy of a dwelling unit owned by the cooperative housing corporation;

“Stock” means shares of stock issued by a business cooperative housing corporation or membership certificates issued by a non-business cooperative housing corporation;

“Transfer value” means the value that may be paid or received upon the sale or transfer of the stock of a cooperative housing corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 185, § 1.

7-6.1-5.
Applicability of other laws — Conflict of laws.

The provisions of chapter 1.2 of this title are applicable to cooperative housing corporations. However, a limited-equity housing corporation may elect to apply the provisions of chapter 6 of this title to the corporation’s operation in lieu of chapter 1.2 of this title. All cooperative housing corporations shall enjoy the powers and privileges, and be subject to the duties, restrictions, and liabilities of other corporations, except where inconsistent with the letter and purpose of this chapter. This chapter takes precedence in the event of any conflict with provisions of chapter 1.2 or 6 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 185, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 5; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 5.

7-6.1-6.
Articles of organization.

Three (3) or more persons who are residents of the state may organize a cooperative housing corporation by filing articles of organization with the secretary of the state. The articles must meet the requirements of chapter 1.2 of this title and shall additionally state:

Whether transfer of its stock is restricted;

Whether or not it is authorized to pay dividends on its stock, but no cooperative corporation may pay a dividend of more than ten percent (10%), noncumulative, upon its stock;

Whether the transfer value of its stock is restricted;

Whether it is organized as a business or non-business cooperative housing corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 5; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 5.

7-6.1-7.
Name.

The name of each cooperative housing corporation must comply with the relevant provisions of chapter 1.2 or 6 of this title and, in addition, must contain the word “cooperative”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 5; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 5.

7-6.1-8.
Name — Forfeiture — Judicial action.

Any domestic or foreign person, partnership, association, or corporation, except producers’ cooperatives, consumers’ cooperatives, cooperative banks and corporations, transacting business in the state under any name or title containing the word “cooperative” or any close variation, forfeits to the state one hundred dollars ($100) for every day the name or title is used. The forfeiture may be recovered by an information brought in the supreme court or superior court by the attorney general or any other person. The court may enjoin the unlawful use and may make any other orders and decrees that justice and equity require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 256, § 1.

7-6.1-9.
Power to make, amend, or repeal bylaws.

The power to make, amend, or repeal bylaws is reserved to the stockholders or members in the case of a non-business cooperative housing corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 256, § 1.

7-6.1-10.
Articles or bylaws.

The articles or bylaws may provide:

For election of directors and other officials by unit or district;

For voting by stockholders or members on the basis of one vote per stockholder or member, or one vote per dwelling unit rather than one vote per share or certificate;

That any action required or permitted to be taken at a meeting of stockholders or members may be taken by mail ballot;

For a method of membership representation of stockholders or members at meetings by delegates from units or districts; provided, that delegates must be proportional to the number of stockholders or members in each unit district;

For redemption or recall of stock;

For termination of membership rights and privileges of a stockholder;

Standards for eligibility to become a stockholder or member;

For the allocation of its net savings among the uses permitted in §

7-6.1-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 256, § 1.

7-6.1-11.
Net savings — Apportionment.

At least once a year, the board of every cooperative housing corporation shall, after first setting aside an adequate portion of the net savings in a reserve fund for the general operation of the business, apportion the remainder of the net savings in one or more of the following ways:

As a dividend not to exceed ten percent (10%), noncumulative, upon one or more classes of stock;

As an equitable distribution or refund to all patrons in proportion to their individual patronage except that:

In the case of a subscriber patron, the distribution or refund may be credited to the subscriber’s account until the subscription has been fully paid; and

In the case of a nonmember patron, the amount otherwise distributable may be retained by the cooperative housing corporation;

This section does not prevent a cooperative housing corporation from disposing of the net savings by reducing the cost of goods, facilities, or services or by applying the net savings otherwise for the common benefit of members or stockholders;

This section does not prevent a cooperative housing corporation from adopting a system by which the payment of net savings is deferred for a fixed period of time, nor from adopting a system in which the net savings distributed are partly in cash and partly in stock.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 7.

7-6.1-12.
Termination of proprietary leases.

A cooperative housing corporation may terminate all of its proprietary leases, but only by agreement of proprietary lessees holding at least eighty percent (80%) of its stock or any larger percentage than specified in the articles or bylaws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 256, § 1.

7-6.1-13.
Loans.

Any financial institution organized, incorporated, chartered, or licensed to conduct business under the laws of the state of Rhode Island shall be authorized to make loans secured by a pledge of a proprietary lease and the appurtenant stock of a cooperative housing corporation upon the same terms and with the same limitations as loans secured by mortgages of real property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 7.